Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Public Transit

§ 5088.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Fixed route service” means a public transit service operated over a set route or network of routes on a regular schedule.

“New public transit service” means any eligible public transit service not previously provided.

“Nonprofit public transit system” means a domestic corporation organized in accordance with Title 11B having the majority of its governing board appointed by the legislative body of the municipality or municipalities served, and a function of providing a public transit service or a foreign nonprofit corporation located in a state which borders Vermont and provides public transit services in both Vermont and the bordering state.

“Paratransit” means transportation services, provided through flexible scheduling or routing in small vehicles, such as ride-matching, dial-a-ride, jitney, subscription, and route-deviated bus services.

A “public transit service” means any fixed route, paratransit, transportation brokerage, user-side subsidy, and or rideshare/ride-match program which is available to any person upon payment of the proper fare, and which is promoted to be available to all members of the public, including those with special needs.

A “public transit system” means:

a transportation authority as provided by 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 801;

a transit authority or transit district as provided by chapter 127 of this title;

any municipal transit system, or any nonprofit public transit system;

a local chapter of the American National Red Cross created by Congress under 36 U.S.C. chapter 3001 that provides public transit service; or

an intercity bus carrier.

[Repealed.]

“Transportation brokerage” means matching the most appropriate services and providers to individual markets.

“User-side subsidy” means a direct subsidy to users which allows them to select the service they prefer.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1991, No. 50

, § 253a;

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 17, 1994;

1995, No. 60

, § 28, eff. April 25, 1995;

2001, No. 64

, § 17, eff. June 16, 2001;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 47(1).

§ 5089.
Planning.

The Agency of Transportation’s Public Transit Plan for the State shall be amended no less frequently than every five years. The development of the State Public Transit Plan shall include consultation with public transit providers, the metropolitan planning organization, and the regional planning commissions and their transportation advisory committees to ensure the integration of transit planning with the transportation planning initiative as well as conformance with chapter 117 of this title (municipal and regional planning and development). Regional plans, together with the Agency of Transportation’s Public Transit Plan shall function to coordinate the provision of public, private nonprofit, and private for-profit regional public transit services, in order to ensure effective local, regional, and statewide delivery of services.

Recognizing that the growing demand for new regional and commuter services must be considered within the context of the continuing need for local transit services that meet basic mobility needs, the Agency of Transportation shall consult annually with the regional planning commissions and public transit providers in advance of the award of available planning funds. The Agency shall maintain a working list of both short- and long-term planning needs, goals, and objectives that balances the needs for regional service with the need for local service. Available planning funds shall be awarded in accordance with State and federal law and as deemed necessary and appropriate by the Agency following consultation with the regional planning commissions and the public transit providers.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 17, 1994;

2001, No. 64

, § 18, eff. June 16, 2001;

2009, No. 50

, § 73;

2011, No. 62

, § 33.

§ 5090.
Human service transit.

The Secretary of Human Services shall direct Agency of Human Services programs to purchase client transportation through public transit systems in all instances where public transit services are appropriate to client needs and as cost-efficient as other transportation.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. June 17, 1994.

§ 5091.
Funding.

The Secretary of Transportation, within the annual budget setting process, shall meet with the Public Transit Advisory Council and representatives of public transit systems to establish the level of State funds needed by public transit systems in Vermont, and shall consider this level in formulating the Agency of Transportation’s proposed Transportation Program.

State funds authorized by the General Assembly as grant assistance for the operation of public transit services shall be eligible for use as a matching source for federal funds.

The same fiscal accountability requirements and regulatory standards shall apply to all grantees of funds as provided by rule of the Secretary of Transportation.

Rideshare, capital, contracted services, and transportation brokerage services are not to be considered as operating funds under this section.

State funds shall be paid to eligible grantees as follows:

the first payment of 50 percent of the estimated annual fiscal year total shall be paid immediately upon execution of the grant;

subsequent payments shall be paid quarterly based on projected need determined by current fiscal year spending and availability of funds;

additional payments, if necessary, shall occur only if actual costs exceed the previous payments and if funds are available.

[Repealed.]

Monies which are in excess of the grantee’s net project cost shall be returned to the Agency of Transportation within 30 days of the Agency’s acceptance of the post-project audit.

Applicants for State funding shall meet the requirements of federal laws and regulations relating to fiscal accountability and accessibility by persons with a disability.

The Agency of Transportation shall distribute State and federal funds to public transit systems through an annual competitive program that implements the public transportation policy goals set forth in section 5083 of this title and

19 V.S.A. § 10f

.

Notwithstanding subsection (i) of this section, and to the extent that appropriated funds are available, no provider who is otherwise eligible shall receive a lesser amount of operating funds than it expended on eligible operating expenses in State fiscal year 2001 for services that remain ongoing, and provided that the amount shall be evaluated as necessary to address changes in the cost of providing the services. In the event that a provider merges with or is otherwise succeeded by another provider, the successor provider shall be entitled to the same protection under this subsection that would have been available to the superseded provider.

Eligibility for an intercity bus carrier is limited to capital and operating assistance for routes which have not demonstrated economic viability. The Agency of Transportation is directed to develop procedures and criteria by December 31, 2001 to administer this subsection. Funding shall be appropriated and distributed outside the funding formula of subsection (i) of this section.

State operating assistance appropriated for projects coming off new public transit service funding in fiscal year 2002 shall not be distributed pursuant to the formula in subsection (i) of this section, but shall be added to the eligible grantees’ funding under subsection (j) of this section to the extent that they meet criteria for successful evaluation at the end of 2002.

Any new State operating assistance appropriated to replace new public transit service funds for routes that have successfully met the evaluation criteria after State fiscal year 2002 shall not be distributed pursuant to the formula in subsection (i) of this section, but shall be added to the eligible grantees’ funding under subsection (j) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. May 15, 1992;

1993, No. 61

, § 28, eff. June 3, 1993;

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 19, 21, eff. June 17, 1994;

2001, No. 64

, § 19, eff. June 16, 2001;

2003, No. 56

, § 39, eff. June 4, 2003;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 47(2);

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 163;

2017, No. 38

, § 17;

2019, No. 59

, § 19.

§ 5092.
Repealed. 2013, No. 167 (Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 5093.
Rules.

Rules reasonable and necessary to implement this chapter may be adopted by the Secretary of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. June 17, 1994;

2003, No. 56

, § 40, eff. June 4, 2003.

§ 5094.
Powers of Secretary of Transportation.

On behalf of the State and to carry out the purposes of this chapter and

19 V.S.A. § 10f

, the Secretary of Transportation may:

execute and file an application with the Federal Transit Administration for federal assistance authorized by Titles 23 and 49 of the U.S. Code or other federal law;

execute and file certifications, assurances, or other documents the Federal Transit Administration may require before awarding a federal assistance grant or cooperative agreement;

execute grant and cooperative agreements with the Federal Transit Administration.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 16, 2012.